Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 4 Construction and Operation of Petroleum Pipelines

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 161, effective July 1, 1995, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the former provisions on the construction and operation of petroleum pipelines.
The former article consisted of Code Sections 22-3-70 through 22-3-72 (Part 1) and 22-3-80 through 22-3-83 (Part 2) and was based on Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act) and Ga. L. 1994, p. 229, §§ 1 and 2. Ga. L. 1995, p. 161 also enacted an Article 4, effective from March 30, 1995, until July 1, 1995, which consisted of Code Section 22-3-83.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 2/HB 413, effective May 9, 2017, for purposes of proposing rules and regulations and effective for all other purposes July 1, 2017, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article.
The former article consisted of Code Sections 22-3-80 through 22-3-91, relating to the construction and operation of petroleum pipelines,
and was based on Ga. L. 1995, p. 161, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 22; Ga. L. 2016, p. 744, § 1/HB 1036 and Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 22(2-4)/HB 323.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 54(e)/HB 323, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2017 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to former Code Section 22-3-89 by Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 22(4)/HB 323, was not given effect.

22-3-80.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Existing petroleum pipeline” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

“Expansion” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

“Extension” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

“Maintenance” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

“New petroleum pipeline” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

“Parallel petroleum pipeline” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

“Petroleum pipeline” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

“Petroleum pipeline company” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 12-17-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 2/HB 413.

22-3-81.
Right to acquire property or property interests by eminent domain.

Subject to the provisions, conditions, and restrictions of this article, petroleum pipeline companies are granted the power to acquire property or interests in property by eminent domain for the purpose of an expansion, an extension, maintenance, or construction of a new petroleum pipeline.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 2/HB 413.

22-3-82.
General certificate and permitting requirements.

A petroleum pipeline company shall not exercise the power of eminent domain granted in Code Section 22-3-81 for the purpose of constructing a new petroleum pipeline or for an extension unless and until a certificate of public convenience and necessity is issued by the commissioner of transportation as provided in Code Section 22-3-83 and a permit is issued by the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources as provided in Chapter 17 of Title 12.

No certificate of public convenience and necessity or permit as provided in Code Section 22-3-83 shall be required of a petroleum pipeline company that is:

Not exercising the power of eminent domain to acquire property; or

Exercising the power of eminent domain for the purpose of maintenance or expansion.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 2/HB 413.

22-3-83.
Certificate of public convenience and necessity; requirements.

On or after July 1, 2017, a petroleum pipeline company desiring to use the power of eminent domain granted under this article to acquire property for a new petroleum pipeline or an extension shall be required to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the commissioner of transportation as provided in this Code section.

Any application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall contain, at a minimum:

A description of the proposed project together with its siting information, including, but not limited to, a map showing the proposed location of the route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the proposed extension;

A description of the public convenience and necessity that support the proposed location of the route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the proposed extension;

The width of the proposed petroleum pipeline corridor up to a maximum width of one-third mile;

A showing that the use of the power of eminent domain may be necessary for construction of the new petroleum pipeline or for the proposed extension;

A showing that the public convenience and necessity for the petroleum pipeline justifies the use of the power of eminent domain; and

Any other information that the Department of Transportation may require by rules and regulations.

Within ten days of applying for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the applicant shall provide:

Public notice in the legal organ of each county through which the proposed route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension is to be located; and

Written notice of the filing of an application under this Code section to all landowners whose property is located within the proposed route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension. Such notice shall be delivered to each landowner and contain the following language in boldface type:

“YOUR PROPERTY IS LOCATED WITHIN THE PROPOSED ROUTE OF A PETROLEUM PIPELINE FOR WHICH AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY HAS BEEN FILED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 4 OF CHAPTER 3 OF TITLE 22 OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED. SAID ARTICLE ALONG WITH CHAPTER 17 OF TITLE 12 OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED PROVIDE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS WHICH MUST BE FOLLOWED BY PETROLEUM PIPELINE COMPANIES BEFORE THEY MAY BUILD A NEW PETROLEUM PIPELINE OR MODIFY AN EXISTING PETROLEUM PIPELINE. THESE PROVISIONS OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED ALSO PROVIDE SPECIFIC RIGHTS FOR YOUR PROTECTION. YOU SHOULD FAMILIARIZE YOURSELF WITH THOSE REQUIREMENTS AND YOUR RIGHTS.”

In making a decision as to whether to grant a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the commissioner of transportation shall consider the following:

Whether existing petroleum pipelines or distribution systems are adequate to meet the reasonable public needs;

The volume of demand for such petroleum, and whether such demand and that reasonably to be anticipated in the future can support already existing petroleum pipelines and distribution systems, if any, and also the petroleum pipeline or distribution system proposed by the applicant;

The financial ability of the applicant to furnish adequate continuous service and to meet the financial obligations of the service which the applicant proposes to perform;

The adequacy of the supply of petroleum to serve the public;

The economic feasibility of the petroleum pipeline or distribution system and the propriety of the engineering and contracting fees, the expenses, and the financing charges and costs connected with the petroleum pipeline or distribution system; and

The effect on existing revenues and service of other petroleum pipelines or distribution systems, and particularly whether the granting of such certificate of public convenience and necessity will or may seriously impair existing public service.

This subsection shall not be construed as exhaustively describing all factors which the commissioner of transportation may consider in his or her decision to grant or deny a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

The applicant shall bear the burden of proof to demonstrate that the commissioner of transportation should issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity as provided under this Code section. The decision to issue or deny a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be based on the record before the commissioner of transportation, which shall include, but not be limited to, the applicant’s submissions, any documents submitted to the Department of Transportation pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section, and research the commissioner of transportation may conduct in analyzing the application.

The issuance or denial of a certificate of public convenience and necessity may be reviewed by a judge of the superior court of the county in which the pipeline company has an agent and place of doing business. The review shall be by petition filed within 30 days of the date of approval or disapproval of the application and shall be determined on the basis of the record before the commissioner of transportation. The action of the commissioner of transportation shall be affirmed if supported by substantial evidence.

No later than July 1, 2018, the Department of Transportation shall, pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and reasonable for purposes of enforcement of this Code section, which shall include, but may not be limited to:

The submission of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity and provisions for the application review process, not to exceed 120 days in length;

Provisions for a nonrefundable application fee which shall be sufficient to defray the administrative costs of review of the application by the Department of Transportation;

Reasonable public notice of the filing of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity to a landowner who, after reasonable efforts, cannot personally be given the notice required in subsection (c) of this Code section; and

Provisions for public meetings to be held prior to any action on any certificates of public convenience and necessity.

No certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be granted by the commissioner of transportation prior to the promulgation of rules and regulations as provided for in this subsection; provided, however, that once such rules and regulations have been promulgated and applications are accepted for filing, if any application is not approved or is denied within 120 days of the date such application is filed with the Department of Transportation under this Code section, the application shall be deemed to be approved by operation of law.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 2/HB 413; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 22/HB 323.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 54(e)/HB 323, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2017 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to paragraph (a)(2) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2017,
p. 774, § 22(2)/HB 323, was not given effect.

22-3-84.
Notice to landowner.

Prior to initiating eminent domain proceedings or threatening to do so, the petroleum pipeline company shall cause to be delivered to each landowner whose property may be condemned a written notice containing the following language in boldface type:

“CHAPTER 17 OF TITLE 12 AND ARTICLE 4 OF CHAPTER 3 OF TITLE 22 OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED PROVIDE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS WHICH MUST BE FOLLOWED BY PETROLEUM PIPELINE COMPANIES BEFORE THEY MAY EXERCISE THE RIGHT TO CONDEMN YOUR PROPERTY. THOSE PROVISIONS OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED ALSO PROVIDE SPECIFIC RIGHTS FOR YOUR PROTECTION. YOU SHOULD FAMILIARIZE YOURSELF WITH THOSE REQUIREMENTS AND YOUR RIGHTS PRIOR TO CONTINUING NEGOTIATIONS CONCERNING THE SALE OF YOUR PROPERTY TO A PETROLEUM PIPELINE COMPANY.”

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 2/HB 413.

22-3-85.
Use of condemnation procedures.

When a petroleum pipeline company that has met all the requirements of this article is unable to acquire the property or interest required for the purpose of an expansion, an extension, maintenance, or construction of a new petroleum pipeline, after reasonable negotiation with the owner of such property or interest, the petroleum pipeline company may acquire such property or interest by the use of the condemnation procedures authorized by Chapter 2 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 2/HB 413; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 22/HB 323.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 54(e)/HB 323, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2017 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to this Code section by Ga. L. 2017,
p. 774, § 22(3)/HB 323, was not given effect.